Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-24,113
Distribution to persons under disability.

A personal representative may discharge his obligation to distribute to any person under legal disability by distributing to his conservator, or any other person authorized by this code or otherwise to give a valid receipt and discharge for the distribution.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 191, UPC § 3-915.